Hawaii statutes.
[§571-48.5] Probation supervision
requirements. Every child placed on probation pursuant to section
571-48(1)(A) shall be supervised in accordance with the following requirements:

(1) Supervision levels, frequency of contacts with
probation officers and the court, and referrals to treatment and programs under
section 571-31.4(c)(7) shall be established using, among other factors, the
results of the risk and needs assessment conducted pursuant to section 571-45;

(2) A case plan, as defined in section 571-2, shall
be developed for each child and submitted to the court. The case plan shall be
developed in consultation with the child and the child's parent, legal
guardian, or custodian. The probation officer assigned to each child shall
keep the child's parent, legal guardian, or custodian informed regarding
development of and progress toward the case plan, the child's conduct,
compliance with the conditions of probation, and any other relevant matter in
the child's case;

(3) A child whose probation term and case plan
require in‑person visits with a probation officer shall receive at least
one home visit; provided that the first visit shall take place within
forty-five days of the child's placement on probation; provided further that a
home visit shall not be required when the probation officer has reasonable
perceptions of risks to the probation officer's safety due to known factors of
violent criminal activity or isolation of the child's place of residence. The
probation officer shall immediately report any reasonable perceptions of risks
to a supervisor and may receive permission to waive the home visit requirement
for the child or to conduct the home visit accompanied by another;

(4) Probation officers shall have the authority to
impose graduated sanctions in response to a violation of the rules and
conditions of probation, as an alternative to judicial modification or
revocation pursuant to section 571-50, or to award incentives or rewards for
positive behavior exhibited by the child. The graduated sanctions and
incentives shall be established as follows:

(A) The judiciary shall adopt guidelines and
procedures for the development and application of a statewide graduated
sanctions and incentives system in accordance with this section, and the deputy
chief court administrator in each judicial circuit, or the administrator's
designee, shall adopt policies or procedures for the implementation of the
adopted graduated sanctions and incentives system to guide probation officers
in imposing sanctions and awarding incentives;

(B) The system shall include a series of
presumptive sanctions for the most common types of probation violations but
shall allow for a child's risk level and seriousness of violation to be taken
into consideration. The system shall also identify incentives that a child may
receive as a reward for compliance with the rules and conditions of probation,
completion of benchmarks, or positive behavior exceeding expectations, at the
discretion of the probation officer;

(C) The system shall be developed with the
following objectives:

(i) To respond quickly, consistently, and
proportionally to violations of the rules and conditions of probation;

(ii) To reduce the time and resources expended
by the court in responding to violations with judicial modification;

(iii) To reduce the likelihood of a new
delinquent act; and

(iv) To encourage positive behavior;

(D) At a child's first meeting with a
probation officer after being adjudicated and disposed to a probation term, the
probation officer shall provide written and oral notification to the child
regarding the graduated sanctions and incentives system to ensure the child is
aware of the sanctions and incentives that may be imposed or rewarded;

(E) When issuing a sanction or incentive, the
probation officer shall provide written notice to the child of the nature and
date of the relevant behavior, the sanction or incentive imposed or rewarded,
and, in the case of sanctions, any applicable time period in which the sanction
will be in effect or by which corrective behavior must be taken. The probation
officer shall provide this information to the court at the next regularly
scheduled review hearing and inform the court of the child's response to the
sanction or incentive; and

(F) Each administrator of the juvenile client
services branch in each judicial circuit shall report annually to the board of
family court judges and the Hawaii juvenile justice state advisory council, the
number and the per cent of children on probation who received a graduated
sanction or incentive, the types of sanctions and incentives used, and the
child's current probation status. [L 2014, c 201, pt of §3]

Note

Section applies to delinquent behavior committed on or after
November 1, 2014. L 2014, c 201, §21(2).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next